Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1324.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1481, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1481. Filing charges; investigation; findings; conciliation; compliance proceedings; appeals; punitive and compensatory damages; attorney fees; violation; classification A. A charge under this section shall be filed within one hundred eighty days after the alleged unlawful employment practice occurred. A charge is deemed filed on receipt by the division from or on behalf of a person claiming to be aggrieved or, if filed by a member of the division, when executed by the member on oath or affirmation. A charge is deemed filed by or on behalf of a person claiming to be aggrieved if received from the United States equal employment opportunity commission. A charge shall be in writing on oath or affirmation and shall contain the information, including the date, place and circumstances of the alleged unlawful employment practice, and be in the form as the division requires. The division shall not make charges public. B. Whenever a charge is filed by or on behalf of a person claiming to be aggrieved or by a member of the division, referred to as the charging party, alleging that an employer, employment agency, labor organization or joint labor-management committee controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining programs, including on-the-job training programs, has engaged in an unlawful employment practice, the division shall serve notice of and a copy of the charge on the employer, employment agency, labor organization or joint labor-management committee, referred to as the respondent, within ten days and shall investigate the charge. If the division determines after the investigation that there is not reasonable cause to believe that the charge is true, the division shall enter an order determining the same and dismissing the charge and shall notify the charging party and the respondent of its action. If the division determines after the investigation that there is reasonable cause to believe that the charge is true, the division shall enter an order containing its findings of fact and shall endeavor to eliminate the alleged unlawful employment practice by informal methods of conference, conciliation and persuasion. Any party to the informal proceeding may be represented by counsel. Counsel need not be a member of the state bar if counsel is licensed to practice law in any other state or territory of the United States. Nothing said or done during and as a part of the informal endeavors may be made public by the division or its officers or employees or used as evidence in a subsequent proceeding without the written consent of the persons concerned. If a civil action resulting from a charge is commenced in any federal or state court, evidence collected by or submitted to the division during the investigation of the charge and the source of the evidence shall be subject to discovery by the parties to the civil action. Any person who makes public information in violation of this subsection is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. The division shall make its determination on reasonable cause as promptly as possible and as far as practicable not later than sixty days from after the filing of the charge. If more than two years have elapsed after the alleged unlawful employment practice occurred, and if the charging party has received a notice of right to sue, the division may cease investigation of a charge without reaching a determination. C. All conciliation agreements shall provide that the charging party waives, releases and covenants not to sue the respondent or claim against the respondent in any forum with respect to the matters which that were alleged as charges filed with the division, subject to performance by the respondent of the promises and representations contained in the conciliation agreement.  The charging party or the respondent may prepare a conciliation agreement that the division shall submit to the other party and that, if accepted by the other party, shall be accepted by the division. D. If within thirty days after the division has made a determination that reasonable cause exists to believe that the charge is true the division has not accepted a conciliation agreement to which the charging party and the respondent are parties, the division may bring a civil action against the respondent, other than the state, named in the charge. The charging party shall have the right to intervene in a civil action brought by the division. If a charge filed with the division pursuant to subsection A of this section is dismissed by the division or if within ninety days from after the filing of such charge the division has not filed a civil action under this section or has not entered into a conciliation agreement with the charging party, the division shall so notify the charging party. After providing the notice, a civil action may be brought against the respondent named in the charge by the charging party or, if that charge was filed by a member of the division, by any person whom the charge alleges was aggrieved by the alleged unlawful employment practice. In no event shall any an action may not be brought pursuant to this article more than one year after the charge to which the action relates has been filed. On application by the complainant and in the circumstances as the court may deem just, the court may appoint an attorney for such complainant and may authorize the commencement of the action without the payment of fees, costs or security. On timely application, the court may in its discretion allow the division to intervene in civil actions in which the state is not a defendant on certification that the case is of general public importance. Upon on request the court may stay further proceedings for not more than sixty days pending the further efforts of the parties or the division to obtain voluntary compliance. E. Whenever a charge is filed with the division and the division concludes on the basis of a preliminary investigation that prompt judicial action is necessary to carry out the purposes of this article or article 4 of this chapter, the division may bring an action for appropriate temporary or preliminary relief pending final disposition of the charge. Any temporary restraining order or other order granting preliminary or temporary relief shall be issued in accordance with the Arizona rules of civil procedure. The court having jurisdiction over the proceedings shall assign such action for hearing at the earliest practicable date and cause the action to be expedited in every way. F. The court shall assign any action brought under this article for hearing at the earliest practicable date and cause the action to be in every way expedited. If the action has not been scheduled for trial within one hundred twenty days after issue has been joined, the judge may appoint a master pursuant to rule 53 of the Arizona rules of civil procedure. G. If the court finds that the defendant has intentionally engaged in or is intentionally engaging in an unlawful employment practice alleged in the complaint, the court may enjoin the defendant from engaging in the unlawful employment practice and order the affirmative action as may be appropriate. Affirmative action may include, but is not limited to, reinstatement or hiring of employees with or without back pay payable by the employer, employment agency or labor organization responsible for the unlawful employment practice or any other equitable relief as the court deems appropriate. Back pay liability shall not accrue from a date more than two years before the filing of the charge with the division. Interim earnings or amounts earnable with reasonable diligence by the person or persons discriminated against shall reduce the back pay otherwise allowable. An order of the court shall not require the admission or reinstatement of an individual as a member of a union or the hiring, reinstatement or promotion of an individual as an employee or the payment to the individual of any back pay if the individual was refused admission, suspended or expelled or was refused employment or advancement or was suspended or discharged for any reason other than discrimination on account of race, color, religion, sex, age, disability or national origin or a violation of section 41-1464. H. if the court finds that the defendant has INTENTIONALLY engaged in or is INTENTIONALLY engaging in an unlawful employment practice alleged in the complaint, the court may award compensatory and punitive damages. Compensatory or punitive damages awarded pursuant to this subsection are in addition to and do not include front pay, back pay, interest on back pay or any other type of relief awarded pursuant to subsection G of this section. I. The amount of compensatory damages awarded pursuant to this section for any future pecuniary loss, emotional pain, suffering, INCONVENIENCE, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment of life and any other nonpecuniary loss and the amount of PUNITIVE damages awarded pursuant to this section may not exceed any of the following for each charging party: 1. $50,000, If the respondent has one hundred or fewer employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year. 2. $100,000, if the respondent has more than one hundred employees but fewer than two hundred one employees IN EACH OF TWENTY OR MORE CALENDAR WEEKS IN THE CURRENT OR PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR. 3. $200,000, if the RESPONDENT HAS MORE THAN two hundred employees but FEWER THAN five hundred one EMPLOYEES in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year. 4. $300,000, if the RESPONDENT HAS MORE THAN five hundred EMPLOYEES in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year. H. J. In any case in which an employer, employment agency or labor organization fails to comply with an order of a court issued in a civil action brought under this section, a party to the action or the division on the written request of a person aggrieved by such failure may commence proceedings to compel compliance with the order. I. K. Any civil action brought under this section and any proceedings brought under subsection H  J of this section are subject to appeal as provided in sections 12-120.21, 12-120.22 and 12-120.24. J. L. In any action or proceeding under this section the court may allow the prevailing party, other than the division, a reasonable attorney fee as part of the costs. END_STATUTE